Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.015

Program to be operated within conditions and limitations.

The department of labor and industries shall operate the crime victims' compensation program within the appropriations and the conditions and limitations on the appropriations provided for this program.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 5: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 15.]

Application—1989 1st ex.s. c 5: "Except as provided in section 4 of this act, sections 1 through 8 of this act shall apply to all claims filed on or after July 1, 1989." [ 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 16.]

Effective dates—1989 1st ex.s. c 5: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and sections 3 and 7 of this act shall take effect immediately [May 14, 1989]. The remaining sections shall take effect July 1, 1989." [ 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 17.]